Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.290

L.I.D.'s—Segregation of assessments—Power of board.

Whenever any land against which there has been levied any special assessment by any park and recreation district shall have been sold in part or subdivided, the board of park and recreation commissioners of such district shall have the power to order a segregation of the assessment.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.69.290. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 30.]